translate/lexd/n.lexd
δакӣҷак:клещ
δакӣҷак:указательный_палец
δакӣҷак:клещ
δандон:зуб
δандон-wеδӣҷ:зубной_техник
δандон-дāрδ:зубная_боль
δандонак:задвижка
δар:далекий
δар-кинӣҷ:тот
δараки:дальний
δаракӣҷ:дальний
δари:даль
δари:удаленность
δафцак:линделофия_длинностолбиковая
δафцак:парациноглосс_зубчиковоплодный
δеw:див
δеw:див
δеw-δикч:неглубокая_вертикальная_впадина_в_горах
δеw-δикч:неглубокая_вертикальная_впадина_в_горах
δеw-бу̊ст:шкура_дива
δеw-бу̊ст:дивья_шкура
δеw-мах̌ак:сорт_мелкого_гороха
δеw-риванд:дикорастущий_горох
δеw-ривандак:дикорастущий_горох
δеw-спафӣҷак:бархатцы_прямостоящие
δеwин:помешанный
δеɣ̌ӡзор:березовые_заросли
δеɣ̌ӡнзор:березовые_заросли
δи-рих̌у̊н:селение_дирушан_на_р_пяндж
δиwêг:дрова
δидӣрм:веник
δидӣрм:веник
δидӣрм:веник
δидӣрмеҷ:полынь_ваханская
δидӣрмеҷ:полынь_веничная
δидӣрмеҷ:растение
δидӣрмеҷ:растение
δийāн:осадки
δийāндах:непогода
δийу̊н:два
δимāниӡ:выделка
δимāнӣҷ:мастер_по_выделке_шкур
δинду̊н:зуб
δинду̊н:зуб
δинду̊н-wеδӣҷ:зубной_техник
δинду̊н-дāрδ:зубная_боль
δинду̊н-зири:скрип
δинду̊н-зири:скрежет
δинду̊н-зирӣ:скрип
δинду̊н-хор:воспаление_десен
δинду̊н-хорак:воспаление_десен
δинду̊нак:задвижка
δих:название_вредителя_гороховых_злаков
δих̌т:горелые_остатки
δих̌т:подгорелые_остатки_кушанья_на_дне_котла
δоδҷак:данный
δорг:палка
δорг:палка
δорг-тêх̌ӣҷ:плотник
δоргак:палочка
δох̌ц:волосы
δох̌ц:шерсть
δох̌ц:волосы_на_теле_человека
δох̌цин:волосатый
δу-рагā:метис
δу̊виӡ:сбор
δу̊вӣҷ:собиратель
δу̊зиӡ:доение
δу̊зӣҷ:доярка
δу̊н:жареное_зерно
δу̊н:поджаренная_пшеница
δу̊нҷ:плодовое_семя
δу̊нҷ:плодовые_семена
δу̊ғ:пахтанье
δу̊ғ:пахтанье
δу̊ғ-мозӣҷ:тот
δу̊ғ-мӣзд:сбивание_масла
δу̊ғ-хух̌пā:похлебка_с_пахтаньем
δу̊ғак:остатки_сливочного_масла_при_растапливании
δу̊ғов:пахтанье_с_водой
δу̊ӡиӡ:доение
δу̊ӡӣҷ:доярка
δуд:дым
δуд:дым
δудадах:дым
δум:задняя
δум:хвост
δум:хвост
δумак:хвостик
δумик:уменьш_к_ум
δумцак:отросток
δумцак:хвостик
δумцак:хвостик
δуст:передняя_нога
δуст:рука
δуст:передняя_нога
δуст:рука
δуст-аwāн:махание_рукой
δуст-х̌ац:вода_для_мытья_рук
δуст-х̌ац:вода_для_мытья_рук
δустак:уменьш_к_уст
δуфцак:линделофия_длинностолбиковая
δуфцак:парациноглосс_зубчиковоплодный
δухêх̌ā:раздвоенная_ветвь_дерева
δӣв:игольное_ушко
δӣд:кизяк
δӣд:навоз
δӣд:навоз
δӣд-вор:корзина_для_навоза
δӣд-зиwêст:вывоз_навоза
δӣд-ках̌:тот
δӣд-тāжӣҷ:тот
δӣд-тӣжд:вынос
δӣд-циму:корзина_для_навоза
δӣд-чāw-чӣд:распределение_удобрения_по_полю
δӣд-чāɣ̌-чӣд:распределение_удобрения_по_полю
δӣдҷӣц:склад
δӣк:почва
δӣк:название_насекомого
δӣкак:название_насекомого
δӣр:ниже
δӣр-зидеҷ:житель_дерзуда
δӣрих̌ен:житель_дерушана
δӣс:десять
δӣс-δӣсак:сто
δӣсак:десяток
δӣф:игольное_ушко
δӣф:игольное_ушко
δӣцак:название_травы
δӣҷӣц:склад
θêwнак:москит
θоw:прижигание
θоw:клеймо
θод:печень
θод:печень
θух̌:легкие
θӣ́мов:исчезание
θӣк:косноязычный
θӣк-θӣк:заикание
θӣк-θӣк:коcноязычие
θӣр:зола
θӣр:зола
θӣр-шап:сосуд_для_золы_из_очага
θӣр-ҷāнд:место_для_сброса_золы
θӣр-ҷу̊н:место_для_сброса_золы
θӣр-ҷу̊нак:место_для_сброса_золы
θӣрич:сурепка
аwғу̊нисту̊н:афганистан
андусту̊н:индия
бāр-харағ:бархорог
бāртāнг:бартанг
бадах̌ху̊н:бадахшан
балҷуwу̊н:бальджуан
барвоз:селение_в_шахдаре
баҷуw:баджув
баҷӯ:с_баджу
баҷӯw:баджув
ву̊мāр:вомар
ву̊мāр:вамар
ву̊мар-ов:устье_р_бартанг_близ_с_вамар
дāрх:оврынг_дарх
дāх̌т-парен:название_оврынга_в_км_от_хорога
дарwоз:дарваз
дарморахт:название_селения
дулик:имя_мальчика
йазгулу̊м:река_язгулям
канҷут:канджут
лангар:лянгар
лах-а-лах:постукивание
лах-лах:постукивание
лолā:имя_девочки
мāмад:мужское_имя
маскоw:москва
муаммад:мужское_имя
муҳаммад:мужское_имя
нибêс-ҷу̊н:внучек
озода-мо:женское_имя
патӯ:
патху̊р:название_селения_на_р_гунт
помер:памир
порх̌инев:поршнев
порх̌нев:поршнев
рам-рам:топот
ризо:мужское_имя
рих̌у̊н:рушан
рих̌у̊н:рушан
ру̊пц-рӣз:горное_растение
рум-рум:топанье
рӯсийā:россия
сāник:имя_мальчика
сангов-дарā:название_летовья
сареӡ:сарез
сафар-мо:женское_имя
сафар-хотӯн:женское_имя
сафдар:мужское_имя
семурғ:симург
сикошум:ишкашим
силайму̊н:сулейман
силту̊ни-wали:название_мазара_в_бархороге
ситāлинобод:сталинабад
сох̌чāрв:название_селения_на_реке_пяндж
стāлинобод:сталинабад
тем:селение_близ_хорога
тих̌ор:тишор
тошканд:ташкент
тоҷикисту̊н:таджикистан
ту̊ник:имя_мальчика
туркисту̊н:туркестан
тӯру̊н:мужское_имя
тӯру̊н:мужское_имя
тӯру̊н-шо:мужское_имя
тӯру̊н-шо:мужское_имя
узбакисту̊н:узбекистан
харāғ:город_хорог
харағ:город_хорог
хитой:китай
хицу̊н:сучан
хох̌-дарā:р_шахдара_и_ее_долина
хох̌дарā:шахдара
хуɣ̌ну̊н:шугнан
хуɣ̌ну̊н:шугнан
ху̊ф:хуф
ху̊ф:хуф
ху̊ф-пастев:название_выселок_одноименного_горного_селения_на_берегу_пянджа
ху̊фак:название_местности
хӣδҷ:название_квартала_в_хороге
чӣн:китай
шойи-сафдар:имя_святого
а-δа:эй
а-δа:друг
а-ло:обращение_девушек_или_женщин_друг_к_другу
а-ро:брат
а-ро:обращение_к_равному
а-ро:звательная_сокращенная_форма_от_vird_брат
а-родāр:брат
а-родāр:обращение_к_равному
а-родāр:звательная_сокращенная_форма_от_vird_брат
а-родāре:эй
а-сар-аθ:снова
а-сарак-аθ:снова
а-чен:ребята
аwwал:начало
аwȥи:глубина
аwал:начало
аwал-вегā:сумерки
аwас:желание
аwас:мечта
аwели:дом
аwеҷ-хух̌пā:похлебка
аwз:бассейн
аwз:бассейн
аwлāқ:скиталец
аwлāқгари:скитание
аwлāқи:скиталец
аwлāқигари:скитание
аwли:двор
аwли:двор
аwлийо:предсказатель
аwлод:близкие
аwлод:потомок
аwлод:потомство
аwлод-бāх̌:разделение_по_родству
аwлодā:потомство
аwо:воздух
аwо:климат
аwо:погода
аwо:воздух
аwо-буцак:небольшой_дождь_или_снег_при_солнце
аwо-буцак:лучи_солнца_во_время_дождя
аwобаланди:высокомерие
аwоги:погода
аwоз:голос
аwоз:право_голоса
аwоз:голос
аwоз-δêд:голосование
аwойи:погода
аwолā:кидание
аwолā:бросок
аwопаймо:воздухоплаватель
аwопаймойи:воздухоплавание
аwорā:бродяга
аwорā:блуждающий
аwораги:бродяжничество
аwохо:хвастун
аwохо:хвастун
аwохойи:хвастовство
аwохойи:хвастовство
аwрат:жена
аwрат:женщина
аwрат:женщина
аwратӣнā:женский_пол
аwғу̊н:афганец
аwғу̊н:афганец
аwқот:пропитание
аwқот:провизия
аwқот-вор:тот
аwқотwори:продукты_питания
аwҷ:энтузиазм
аwҷ:энтузиазм
аwӡ:бассейн
аwӡи:глубина
аɣ̌дал:дракон
аɣ̌дал:обжора
аɣ̌дар:дракон
аɣ̌дар:обжора
а́-бачен:ребята
а́-бачо:ребята
а́-ло:сестра
а́-ло:обращение_родственников_друг_к_другу
а́-роде́:эй
а́-рое́:эй
а́-ройе́:эй
а́-чен:ребята
а́w-а́w:тявканье
а́w-а́w:слух
а́брê:облако
а́бри:облако
а́дйāл:одеяло
а́дли:справедливость
а́зли:шутка
а́мри:приказ
а́р-а́р:пирамидальный_тополь
а́р-а́р:крик_осла
а́р-ҳа́р:пирамидальный_тополь
а́три:духи
аθêрӣҷ:податель
аθич:пучок
абδуст:рукавица
абδустеҷ:материал
абаш:чернокожий
абед:обед
абку̊м:обком
абку̊м:секретарь_обкома
абку̊м:обком
абку̊м:секретарь_обкома
абку̊мпāрт:обком_партии
абку̊мпāртийа:обком_партии
аблā:глупец
аблā:простак
аблā:глупец
аблагари:глупость
аблаги:глупость
аблаги:глупость
аблаку̊в:цеп
аблигā́цийа:облигация
аботā:глупец
аботā:глупость
абохи:тупость
абрā:лицевая_сторона_ткани
абрайеҷ:ткань_для_лицевой_стороны_одежды
абрат:обман
абрат:обман
абрат-δāδӣҷ:обманщик
абрех̌ум:шелк
абрех̌ум:шелк
абрех̌ум:шелк
абри:облако
абридах:облачность
абридахи:облачность
абтари:лень
абубāк:удод
абҷад:абджад
абӣб:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент
абӣб:название_дикорастущего_цветка
абӣб:название_дикорастущего_цветка
абӣн:жена_многоженца
абӣн:ненавистница
абӣн:жена_человека
абӣнêрӡ:жена_многоженца
абӣнêрӡ:ненавистница
абӣндор:жена_человека
абӣнен:жена_многоженца
абӣнен:ненавистница
абӣнорҷ:жена_многоженца
абӣнорҷ:ненавистница
абӣнорҷ:жена_человека
абӯбāк:удод
абӯбāк:удод
авāнц:аванс
авāр:авария
авиā́цийа:авиация
авийā́цийа:авиация
авих̌ц:пучок
авлӣз:стенки_глиняного_сосуда
ага-чи:побудка
ага-чи:побудка
ага-чӣд:побудка
агент:агент
агетпӯнкт:агитпункт
агитā́тор:агитатор
агитā́тур:агитатор
агитā́цийа:агитация
агитāтори:агитаторство
агитāтури:агитаторство
аграну̊м:агроном
аграну̊м:агроном
аграну̊ми:обязанности_агронома
адwо:средства
адāɣ̌ӡ:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы
адāх̌ц:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы
адāх̌ц:железная_деталь_движущего_устройства_мельницы
адаб:благонравие
адаб:благонравие
адабийот:литература
адад:число
адгāл:одеяло
адир:луг
адич:пучок
адли:как_раз
адо:выполнение
адолат:справедливость
адолат:справедливость
адолатхо:поборник_справедливости
аждаор:сказочное_чудовище
аждаор:дракон
аждар:сказочное_чудовище
аждаҳор:сказочное_чудовище
аждаҳор:дракон
аждуор:сказочное_чудовище
аждуор:дракон
аждуҳор:сказочное_чудовище
аждуӽор:дракон
ажғол:члены_семьи
аз-дарӯни:изнутри
аз-ро-δāδӣҷ:совратитель
аз-ро-зан:совратитель
азал:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент
азал:начало
азал:предвечность
аззи:удовлетворение
азлигӯй:шутник
азо:траур
азоб:мучение
азоб:тягота
азойим:заклинания
азойим:отчитывание
азорзā:мешанка
азорзā:поле
азорсалги:тысячелетие
азорсолаги:тысячелетие
азорҷӣд:отдел_желудка
азорҷӣд:желудок
азрат:компонент_имени_собств_муж
азрат:светлость
азрат:величие
азӣз:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент
ай:понукание
ай-кинӣҷ:погонщик
ай-кунӣҷ:погонщик
ай-кунӣҷ:погонщик
айwу̊н:животное
айwу̊н:животное
айwу̊нгари:скотство
айwу̊ндор:владеющий_скотом
айwу̊ндори:животноводство
айwу̊ни:скотство
айwу̊нот:животные
айа́л-даwо́:старание
айб:вина
айб:изъян
айб:вина
айб:вина
айбдор:виновник
айбдори:виновность
айбну̊мā:обвинительное_заключение
айбпӯх̌и:сокрытие_недостатков
айбпӯши:сокрытие_недостатков
айд:праздник
аййор:имя_собств_или_его_компонент
айкал:амулет
айкал:памятник
айлок:пресный_сыр
айму̊н:вера
аймун:вера
айни:самое_время
айни:суть
айо:стыд
айор:имя_собств_или_его_компонент
айори:хитрость
айос:мороз
айот:жизнь
айот:память
айоти:память
айрапилāн:аэроплан
айрапилāн:аэроплан
айрапорт:аэропорт
айрат:удивление
айру̊нги:удивление
айру̊нги:удивление
айру̊ни:удивление
айру̊ни-зораθ:удивленный
айу̊м:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент
айу̊м:праздник
айу̊м:праздник
айу̊меҷ:продукты
айу̊ғи:верхняя_часть_позвоночника
айш:наслаждение
айш:наслаждение
акā:брат
акā:эй
акаде́м:академия
акаде́м:академик
акаде́ми:академия
акаде́ми:академик
акаде́мийā:академия
академик:академик
акак:дрожь
акак:дрожь
акбар:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент
акойат:рассказ
акс:испуг
акс:отражение
акс:страх
аксарийат:большинство
актā:рубашка
актāйи:рубашка
актӣв:актив
актӣв:активист
акц:испуг
акц:отражение
акӣм:врач
акӣм:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент
акӣм:врач
акӯмат:правительство
ал-амду-л-илло:слава_богу
алwанд:подготовка_тока_для_молотьбы
алwо:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент
алwо:халва
алwо:кисель
алwобаӡ:имя_собственное_алwоба
алwобаӡ:мастерица_готовить_халву
алwопаӡ:имя_собственное_алwоба
алwопаӡ:мастерица_готовить_халву
алwу̊н:кумач
алwу̊н:пунцовый
алɣ̌анҷол:слива
алɣ̌анҷол:слива
ала:говорят
алаби:чашка
алалаш:смесь
алалаш:смесь
алалот:громкий_шум
алалот:плач
алам:обида
алам:огорчение
алам:печаль
аламу̊н:вор
аламӯн:вор
алапилāн:аэроплан
алараш:смесь
алаф:трава
алаф:трава
алафзор:луг
алафзор:луг
албу̊м:альбом
албу̊н:альбом
али:как_раз
алиле:плач
алиф:алиф
алиф:имя_собственное_или_его_компонент
алиф:черта
алиф:олифа
алиф:алиф
алиф:черта
алифбê:азбука
алифбê:букварь
алифбо:азбука
алйок:пресный_сыр
алйок:сыр
алйумӣн:алюминий
аллā:пестрый
алли:как_раз
алло:безудержный_плач
аллоз:прыжок
аллоз:прыжок
алмасти:ведьма
алмасти:обжора
алмасти:злой_дух
алмос:алмаз
алмос:кварц
алмос:алмаз
алмос-жӣр:кварц
ало:безудержный_плач
ало-аwли:как_не_стыдно_какой_стыд
алоw:огонь
алоw:огонь
алоw-зибидак:прыганье_через_огонь
алоw-парак:прыганье_через_огонь
алоwā:пламя
алоwā:прибавление
алоwā:прибавление
алоwгāр:кочегар
алоз:прыжок
алоз:прыжок
алойид:отдельный
алойидā:отдельный
алок:гибель
алок:гибель
алокат:гибель
алокат:гибель
алоки:туша_архара
алоли:годный_для_убоя
алолкор:добросовестный
алочā:алча
алоқā:связь
алоқā:пара_подков
алоқā:пара_подков
алоқā:подковывать_на_две_ноги
алоқā:связь
алоқā:связь
алоқадор:имеющий_отношение
алоқадори:наличие_связей
алоқаманд:имеющий_отношение
алпинӣст:альпинист
алтой:помесь_волка_с_собакой
алтой:собака
алтой:помесь_волка_и_собаки
алу̊мат:знак
алумӣн:алюминий
алғаw-бозор:гвалт
алғоw:супряга
алғоw:супряга_соединение_двух_или_нескольких_быков
алғоwдак:род_коршуна
алғоwдак:род_коршуна
алғоɣ̌дак:род_коршуна
алқ:горло
алқā:петля
алқā:петля
алқанҷак:вид_узла
алқанҷак:мертвая_петля
ам-дигар:взаимно
ам-ну̊м:одноименный
ам-радӣф:сверстник
ам-сабāқ:одноклассник
ам-тан:ровня
ам-ҷинс:сверстник
